Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF864.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [340A.920] LICENSE REQUIRED FOR THIRD-PARTY DELIVERY OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin License required. new text end new text begin Delivery of alcoholic beverages is prohibited unless the delivery is made from a licensed premises and: new text end new text begin (1) by a licensed or authorized off-sale liquor retailer; or new text end new text begin (2) a third-party delivery service that holds a license to deliver alcoholic beverages. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin License issuance. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue a third-party delivery license to a third-party delivery service who pays the fee and meets the requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Fee. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall charge an annual fee of $500 for a third-party delivery off-sale liquor license. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Employees. new text end new text begin A third-party delivery licensee must use the delivery service's employees or independent contractors who are at least 21 years of age to deliver alcoholic beverages and facilitate orders for the sale and delivery of alcoholic beverages. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Age requirement. new text end new text begin An individual who purchases alcoholic beverages for delivery through a third-party delivery service must be at least 21 years of age. Delivery service employees or independent contractors must verify the individual's age at the point of delivery. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Training requirement. new text end new text begin An individual delivering alcoholic beverages under a third-party delivery license must complete alcoholic beverages awareness training prior to delivering alcoholic beverages on behalf of the third-party delivery service. Proof of completion must be submitted to the third-party delivery service. The third-party delivery service must provide proof of completion to the commissioner upon request. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Insurance requirement. new text end new text begin A third-party delivery licensee must obtain liquor liability insurance under section 340A.409. new text end